District of Columbia statutes.
46-301.03

Repealed

Remedies cumulative.

Repealed.

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 103, 42 DCR 6748
June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(a)(2), 53 DCR 3634
Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 902, 63 DCR 222
Court-ordered child support payments, arrearages, interception of District income tax refunds of individuals, see § 47-
1981 Ed., § 30-341.3.
D.C. Law 16-137 rewrote the section, which had read as follows: “Remedies provided by this chapter are cumulative and do not affect the availability of remedies under other law.”

Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 104 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).